Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.060

Suspension or demotion of probationary officers.

The chief of the Washington state patrol may suspend or demote any officer with probationary status, without preferring charges against the officer, and without a hearing.

[ 1984 c 141 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.060. Prior: 1943 c 205 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6362-67.]